Maine, session 132, LD1759.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. PL 2025, c. 2, Pt. J, §1 is amended to read:
Sec. J-1. Transfer from General Fund; Board of Trustees of the Maine
Community College System, MCCS Free Community College - Two
Enrollment Years Program; fiscal year 2025-26. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, on or before June 30, 2026, the State Controller shall transfer
$7,300,000 $6,500,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the MCCS
Free Community College - Two Enrollment Years program, Other Special Revenue Funds
account within the Board of Trustees of the Maine Community College System to continue
support of the 2 years of free community college for all eligible students who meet the
conditions in Public Law 2023, chapter 412, Part QQQ, section 3, subsection 2.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
MCCS Free Community College - Two Enrollment Years Z335
Initiative: Reduces one-time funding provided in Public Law 2025, chapter 2 for the State's
7 community colleges to continue offering student scholarships through the State's free
community college tuition program for eligible persons who graduate high school or obtain
the equivalent of a high school diploma in 2024 or 2025.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($800,000) $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($800,000) $0
2240 Regional Fire Service Training Fund Z356
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to the Maine Fire Service Institute.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $800,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $800,000 $0
3206
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF
TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $800,000 $0
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS ($800,000) $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $0